Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.12
Common area, defined.

Common area means a portion of a building that is generally accessible to all occupants and may include, but is not limited to, a hallway, stairway, laundry or recreational room, playground, community center, garage, or boundary fence.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 14.